Washington statutes.
RCW 15.36.231

Raw milk or milk products—Bottling and capping—Packaging—Labeling.

(1) Milk and milk products for consumption in the raw state shall be bottled or packaged on the farm where produced. Bottling and capping shall be done in a sanitary manner by means of approved equipment and operations. Caps or cap stock shall be purchased in sanitary containers and kept therein in a clean dry place until used.

(2) All containers enclosing raw milk or any raw milk product shall be plainly labeled or marked with the word "raw" and the name of the producer or packager. The label or mark shall be in letters of a size, kind, and color approved by the director and shall contain no marks or words which are misleading.

[ 2005 c 414 s 2; 1999 c 291 s 14; 1961 c 11 s 15.36.265. Prior: 1955 c 238 s 38; prior: 1949 c 168 s 7, part; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 6266-36, part. Formerly RCW 15.36.265.]